Washington statutes.
RCW 36.56.121

Maintenance plan.

As a condition of receiving state funding, a county that has assumed the transportation functions of a metropolitan municipal corporation shall submit a maintenance and preservation management plan for certification by the department of transportation. The plan must inventory all transportation system assets within the direction and control of the county, and provide a preservation plan based on lowest life-cycle cost methodologies.

[ 2006 c 334 s 29; 2003 c 363 s 303.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 334: See note following RCW 47.01.051.

Finding—Intent—2003 c 363: See note following RCW 35.84.060.

Part headings not law—Severability—2003 c 363: See notes following RCW 47.28.241.